Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.101

Property of deceased inmates of state institutions—Disposition after two years.

Where, upon the expiration of two years after the death of any inmate of any state institution, there remains in the custody of the superintendent of such institution, money or property belonging to said deceased inmate, the superintendent shall forward such money to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund of the state, and shall report such transfer and any remaining property to the department of corrections, which department shall cause the sale of such property and proceeds thereof shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

[ 1981 c 136 s 58; 1979 c 141 s 10; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.101. Prior: 1951 c 138 s 1; prior: 1923 c 113 s 1; RRS s 1363-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Abandoned inmate personal property: RCW 63.42.030, 63.42.040.

State institutions: Title 72 RCW.